Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202054-625
Act, how cited.

Sections 54-625 to 54-643 shall be known and may be cited as the Commercial Dog and Cat Operator Inspection Act.

Laws 2000, LB 825, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 274, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 856, § 13;

Laws 2007, LB12, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB241, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB427, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB360, § 13.